ku_TR.dic
aborînas/mn
aborînasî/m
aborîzan/mn
aborîzanî/m
adekirin/m
afirand/Ee
afirandêr/mn
afirîner/mn
agahdarbûn/m
agahdarî/m
agir/n
agirbest/m
ahengsazî/m
ajan/mn
ajot/e
ajotin/m
al/m
alav/n
alfabe/m
altaxkirin/m
alî/n
alîgir/mn
alîkarbûn/m
amadebûn/m
amadekar/mn
amadekirin/m
Amed/m
anîbûn/m
arastekirin/m
armanc/m
aso/m
astengbûn/m
asêbûn/m
av/m
avahî/m
avisbûn/m
avzêrkirin/m
axaftin/m
azadbûn/m
azadî/m
aşkirin/m
aştîperwer/mn
bacan/n
bajar/n
bajarok/m
bakur/n
balafirgeh/m
balgîf/m
bandor/m
bangkirin/m
bapîr/m
bar/n
barandin/m
bask/n
bastêq/m
bav/n
bawerkirin/m
bawernekirin/m
bazirgan/mn
başî/m
belavbûn/m
belge/m
berda/e
berdan/m
berdide/Dd
berendam/mn
berevajî/m
berfireh/r
bergeh/m
berhevkirin/m
berpirsiyar/mn
bersiv/m
berxik/n
berxwedan/m
beş/m
beşdarkirin/m
bianî/m
bicihkirin/m
bihar/m
bihêz/r
bihêzbûn/m
bihîst/Ee
bikarhêner/mn
bin/n
binavkirin/m
bindestî/m
binçavkirin/m
bir/Ee
biribûn/m
biryar/m
birçîbûn/m
birêzkirin/m
birîndarkirin/m
biyanî/m
bizane/d
biçûk/r
bê/d
bêhezkirin/m
bîne/d
bîr/m
bîst/n
bû/Ee
bûbûn/m
bûn/m
can/n
ceriband/Ee
ceribandin/m
cewher/m
cih/n
civak/m
civaknas/mn
civîn/m
ciwan/mn
ciwanî/m
cudabûn/m
cîhan/m
cîran/mn
da/Ee
dadgeh/m
dadikeve/Dd
dagire/d
dagirkirin/m
dagirt/Ee
dajo/d
daket/e
damezirand/Ee
damezirandin/m
danasîn/m
danûstandin/m
dar/mn
dardakirin/m
davêje/d
davêt/e
dawet/m
daxe/d
daxist/e
daxistin/m
daxuyand/e
daxuyanî/m
daxwazname/m
dayikbûn/m
dem/m
demokrasî/m
deng/n
dengbêj/mn
derbasbûn/m
derbirîn/m
derd/n
derdikeve/Dd
derdixe/Dd
dereng/r
derhêner/mn
derket/Ve
ders/m
dertê/d
derxist/Ve
derz/m
derî/n
dest/n
destdan/m
destpêk/m
destûr/m
dev/n
devê/n
dewletbûn/m
diafirîne/Dd
dibe/Dd
dibetile/Dd
dibeze/Dd
dibistan/m
dibêje/Dd
dibîne/Dd
dide/Dd
didize/Dd
didome/Dd
difikire/Dd
difilite/Dd
difire/Dd
difiroşe/Dd
digere/Dd
digihîje/Dd
digihîne/Dd
digire/D
digire/Dd
digre/Dd
diguhere/Dd
diguherîne/Dd
diherike/Dd
dihesibîne/Dd
dihêle/Dd
dijmin/mn
dijwar/r
dikare/d
dike/Dd
dikeve/Dd
dikuje/Dd
dil/n
dildarî/m
dilsoz/m
dilxweşî/m
dilîze/Dd
dimeşe/Dd
dimeşîne/Dd
dimire/Dd
dimîne/Dd
dinase/Dd
dinihêre/Dd
dinirxîne/Dd
dinivîse/Dd
dinivîsîne/Dd
dinya/n
diparêze/Dd
dipejirîne/Dd
dipeyive/Dd
dipirse/Dd
dipîve/Dd
diqede/Dd
direve/Dd
dirêj/r
dirêjî/m
disekine/Dd
distîne/Dd
diteqe/Dd
ditikîne/Dd
ditirse/Dd
ditixe/Dd
diweste/Dd
diweşîne/Dd
dixe/Dd
dixebite/Dd
dixemilîne/Dd
dixwaze/Dd
dixwe/Dd
dixwîne/Dd
dizane/d
dizire/Dd
dizîn/m
dizîvire/Dd
diçe/Dd
diçîne/Dd
diêşîne/Dd
dişewite/Dd
dişo/d
dişîne/Dd
domand/Ee
dorpêçkirin/m
dost/mn
dostanî/m
doz/m
duberebûn/m
dêm/n
dîrok/m
dîroknas/mn
dîrokzan/mn
dît/Ee
dûr/r
dûrxistin/m
endam/mn
enî/m
erd/n
evraz/n
evîn/m
evîndar/mn
famkirin/m
ferheng/m
ferman/m
firot/Ee
firotin/m
fêmkirin/m
fîlm/n
gav/m
gel/n
gelawêj/m
germahî/m
gerîla/mn
gihaşt/Ee
gihîşt/Ee
gihîştin/m
giran/r
girav/m
girt/Ee
girtî/mn
girêda/e
girêdan/m
girîng/r
giyan/m
goristan/m
got/Ee
gotin/m
govendgirtin/m
guh/n
guhdar/mn
guhdarkirin/m
guherand/Ee
guhert/Ee
guhertin/m
guherî/Ee
guherîn/m
gulan/m
gund/n
gundî/mn
guneh/m
guneh/n
hat/Ee
hatin/m
hebû/e
hebûn/m
heft/n
hejand/Ee
hejmartin/m
helbestvan/mn
helîvank/m
here/d
herikandin/m
heskirin/m
hesp/n
heval/mn
hevalbend/mn
hevaltî/m
hevgirtin/m
hevpeyvîn/m
hewl/m
heyecan/m
hezkirin/m
hilbijart/e
hilbijartin/m
hilbijêre/d
hildibijêre/d
hildide/d
hişkbûn/m
hiştibûn/m
hunermend/mn
hêsan/r
hêstir/m
hêstir/n
hêz/m
hînkarî/m
hûnandin/m
jehr/m
jibîrkirin/m
jinûveavakirin/m
jiyan/m
jor/r
jêrhiş/m
kadro/mn
kar/n
karker/mn
karkirin/m
karmend/mn
karsaz/mn
kedkar/mn
kedxwar/mn
kedxwarî/m
kek/n
kes/mn
keser/m
ket/Ee
kevir/n
kevn/r
kevneşopî/m
keç/m
kir/Ee
kirin/m
kirêtkir/e
kişand/Ee
kişandin/m
kom/m
kombûn/m
komkirin/m
komplo/m
Konfederasyon/m
konser/m
kovar/m
krîz/m
kur/n
kurd/mn
kurdî/m
kurt/r
kuçe/m
kuşt/Ee
kêf/m
kêm/r
kêmasî/m
kûr/r
kûrbûn/m
law/n
lawaz/r
lawik/n
laş/n
leheng/mn
lehî/m
leşker/n
lidarxistin/m
lêgerîn/m
lêkolîn/m
lîst/Ee
lîstikvan/mn
lîstin/m
mabû/e
maf/n
mal/mn
malbat/m
malpersaz/mn
mamoste/mn
mar/n
mast/n
masî/n
mebest/m
meh/m
mele/n
mezin/r
mezinahî/m
meş/m
meşand/Ee
mij/m
mil/n
milet/n
milyon/n
milîtan/mn
mir/e
mirov/mn
mirî/mn
mizgînî/m
mêbûn/m
mêvan/mn
mîhrîcan/m
mîr/n
name/m
nan/n
nasname/m
nav/n
navdar/mn
navend/m
navkirin/m
navçe/m
neh/n
nerazîbûn/m
netewîbûn/m
nifûs/m
nirx/n
nirxand/Ee
nirxandin/m
nivîs/m
nivîsand/Ee
nivîskar/mn
nizane/d
nizanibe/d
nêrbûn/m
nêzîk/r
nêzîkbûn/m
nîsk/m
nû/r
nûbûn/m
nûjen/r
nûkirin/m
nûner/mn
nûçe/m
operasyon/m
parastin/m
parçe/n
parçekirin/m
parêzer/mn
parêzname/m
pergal/m
perçekirin/m
peyam/m
peyv/m
pir/r
piranî/m
pirsgirêk/m
pirtûkfiroş/mn
pismam/n
pispor/mn
piştgirî/m
polîs/n
proje/m
pêkanîn/m
pêlîstok/m
pênc/n
pêncî/n
pêvajo/m
pêwistî/m
pêşeng/mn
pêşengî/m
pêşketin/m
pêşketî/r
pêşniyarkirin/m
pêşwazîkirin/m
pêşî/m
pîroz/r
pîrozbahî/m
pîvan/m
pûçkirin/m
qalind/r
qanûn/m
qedand/Ee
qedexekirin/m
qelew/r
qesab/n
qetilkirin/m
qirkirin/m
qirêj/r
Qoser/m
qutkirin/m
qîmet/m
rabe/d
raborî/m
rabû/Ve
radibe/Dd
radigihîne/Dd
radihêje/Dd
radike/Dd
radikeve/Dd
radiweste/Dd
radixe/Dd
radixîne/Dd
ragihand/Ve
ragihandin/m
rahişt/Ve
raket/Ve
rakir/Ve
raman/m
rast/m
rast/r
rastî/m
rawestand/Ve
rawestandin/m
raxistin/m
reben/r
reng/n
rewş/m
rewşenbîr/mn
rexne/m
rexnegir/mn
rexnegirî/m
rext/n
reşahî/m
rind/r
rizgarî/m
roj/m
rojname/m
rojnameger/mn
rojnamegerî/m
rojnamevan/mn
rojî/m
roman/m
romannivîs/mn
Romanya/m
ronahî/m
ronî/m
ronî/r
rovî/n
rêbaz/m
rêber/mn
rêbir/mn
rêheval/mn
rêk/m
rêveber/mn
rêzan/mn
rûnişt/Ee
rûniştin/m
sal/mn
sar/r
sed/n
Sedam/n
sedem/m
ser/n
serdem/m
serdest/mn
serhatî/m
sermayedar/mn
serok/mn
serokatî/m
sist/r
siyaset/m
stand/Ee
standin/m
stranbêj/mn
sunetkirin/m
sî/n
tarîtî/m
tecrîd/m
temaşevan/mn
temen/n
teng/r
tepik/m
teqand/Ee
tevayî/m
tijî/r
tilî/m
tirş/r
tişt/n
torê/m
tund/r
têbikoşe/d
têdikoşe/d
têkilî/m
têkoşer/mn
têkçû/e
têr/m
têr/r
tîne/d
vala/r
vebû/Ve
vebûn/m
vedibe/Dd
vedigere/Dd
vedike/Dd
vedimîne/Dd
vegerand/Ve
vehatin/m
vekir/Ve
vema/Ve
vemirand/Ve
vexwar/Ve
war/n
wate/m
welat/n
welatparêz/mn
welatperwer/mn
were/d
wergerand/Ee
wergirt/e
wesitiyabûn/m
wext/n
wezîr/mn
weşand/Ee
weşandin/m
wêje/m
wênekêş/mn
wênesaz/mn
wêrankirin/m
xebatkar/mn
xebitand/Ee
xelk/n
xemiland/Ee
xemilandin/m
xerîb/m
xeyal/m
xist/Ee
xort/n
xurt/r
xwar/Ee
xwarin/m
xwedî/mn
xwendekar/mn
xwendevan/mn
xwest/Ee
xwestin/m
xweş/r
xweşik/r
xwişk/m
xêrxwaz/mn
xêz/m
yekîtî/m
zanist/m
zanyar/mn
zargotin/m
zarok/mn
zehmet/r
zelal/r
zelalkirin/m
Zerdeşt/n
zilam/n
ziman/n
zimanzan/mn
zuhakirin/m
zêde/r
zû/r
zûrîn/m
çalakger/mn
çalakvan/mn
çand/Ee
çand/m
çapemenî/m
çareserî/m
çav/n
çay/m
çek/n
çem/n
çep/n
çepgir/mn
çewtî/m
çiya/n
çêbû/Ee
çêdibe/Dd
çêdike/Dd
çêj/m
çêkir/Ee
çîrok/m
çîrokbêj/mn
çîroknûs/mn
çû/Ee
çûk/n
çûn/m
êrîşkar/mn
êş/m
şand/Ee
şanoger/mn
şaredar/mn
şaristanî/m
şax/n
şehîd/mn
şekir/n
şer/n
şervan/mn
şewitand/Ee
şeş/n
şikand/Ee
şikeft/m
şikest/Ee
şivan/mn
şoreşger/mn
şêx/n
şîr/n
şîrîn/r
şîrovekirin/m
